District of Columbia statutes.
48-803.03a

Dispensing of substitute drug products by pharmacists — notification of substitution.

(a)

An individual shall be notified of a drug substitution and provided the right to refuse the substitution prior to purchase of the substitute drug product.

(b)

(1)

The Department of Health shall create and distribute to all pharmacies signs that state in block letters not less than one inch in height: “This pharmacy may substitute a less expensive drug product that is equivalent to the one prescribed by your health care practitioner unless you request otherwise.

(2)

Each pharmacy shall display the sign in a prominent place that has a clear and unobstructed public view at or near the place where prescriptions are dispensed.

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title III, § 301
as added Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-118, § 2(d), 57 DCR 901